Utah statutes.
16-11-11.   Authority of regulating boards not restricted or limited.
Nothing in this act shall restrict or limit in any manner the authority and
duty of the regulating board for the licensing of individual persons rendering
professional services or the practice of the profession which is within the
jurisdiction of such regulating board, notwithstanding that such person is an
officer, director, shareholder or employee of a professional corporation and
rendering such professional services or engaging in the practice of such
profession through such professional corporation.
